test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-suonjar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:





  Noun - suonjâr: # 2B
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Nom: suonjâr
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Gen: suonnjâr
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Acc: suonnjâr
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Ill: suonjârân
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Loc: suonjârist
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Com: suonjâráin
    suonjâr+N+Sg+Abe: suonnjârttáá
    suonjâr+N+Ess:    suonjârin
    suonjâr+N+Par:    suonjârid
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Nom: suonjâreh
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Gen: suonjârij
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Acc: suonjârijd
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Ill: suonjâráid
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Loc: suonjârijn
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Com: suonjârijguin
    suonjâr+N+Pl+Abe: suonjârijttáá
